src-fst-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
Verb inflection
The LOW SAXON language verbs inflect in persons. So far only for northwestern dialects.

tellen:tell
Orthographic variation in consonant length




maken:maak
Orthographic variation in marking of long vowels, perfect participle '-ed'






völen:vööl
Orthographic variation in marking of long vowels, perfect participle '-d'






koaken:koak
No orthographic variation in marking of long vowels or consonants, perfect participle '-ed'






waien:wai
No orthographic variation in marking of long vowels or consonants, perfect participle '-d'






sakken:sakk
Orthographic variation in consonant length, perfect participle '-ed'






ryden:r%{ei0%}%{ya0%}d
Strong verb class 1, 4c






beden:b%{eouü%}%{0eua%}d
Strong verb class 2






drinken:dr%{iua%}nk
Strong verb class 3





winnen:w%{iua%}nn
Strong verb class 3, stem ending with two identical consonants






niamen:n%{iaeo%}%{ae0%}m
Strong verb class 4a,b






steaken:st%{eia%}%{ae0%}k
Strong verb class 5










* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-nds/blob/main/../src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>
